Wyoming, session 2025, SF0016.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-12-102(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xvi), 35-12-107(c) by creating a new paragraph
(iv), (d)(ii) and (g)(ii) and 35-12-110(a) by creating a
new paragraph (iv) and (f)(ii) are amended to read:
35-12-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
(xvi) "Tribal government" means the tribal
government of the Eastern Shoshone tribe, the tribal
government of the Northern Arapaho tribe of the Wind River
Indian Reservation and the cooperative tribal governing
body.
35-12-107. Request for waiver of permit application;
form.
(c) Not more than seven (7) days following receipt of
a request for a waiver, the director shall:
(iv) Serve notice of the request upon each
tribal government located within the same or adjacent
county to where the industrial facility will be located.
(d) Not more than fourteen (14) days following
receipt of a request, the director shall:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0016
ENROLLED ACT NO. 2, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Notify the applicant, tribal governments,
if applicable, and local governments of the meeting and,
for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S.
35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), notify affected
landowners;
(g) Not more than fifty (50) days following receipt
of a request, the director shall:
(ii) Notify the applicant, tribal governments,
if applicable, and local governments of the hearing and,
for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S.
35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), notify affected
landowners;
35-12-110. Service of notice of application;
information and recommendations; application deficiencies;
procedure; jurisdiction; hearing.
(a) Not more than ten (10) days following receipt of
an application for a permit, the director shall:
(iv) Serve an electronic or physical copy of the
application and notice of hearing upon each tribal
government located within the same or adjacent county to
where the industrial facility will be located.
(f) Not more than ninety (90) days after receipt of
an application for a permit, the director shall:
(ii) Notify the applicant, tribal governments,
if applicable, and local governments of the hearing and,
for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0016
ENROLLED ACT NO. 2, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), notify affected
landowners;
Section 2. This act shall apply to all applications
for industrial siting permits filed on and after the
effective date of this act.
Section 3. The industrial siting council shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0016
ENROLLED ACT NO. 2, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4